Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.040

Conveyances for use of county.

Every conveyance of lands, or transfer of other property, made in any manner for the use of any county, shall have the same force and effect as if made to the county in its proper and corporate name.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.01.040. Prior: Code 1881 s 2656; 1863 p 538 s 2; 1854 p 329 s 2; RRS s 3985.]